Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104.01
Veterans Day; proclamation by Governor; prohibition of transaction of business by state departments; manner of observance.

The Governor shall issue his proclamation each year designating Veterans Day and calling upon the public schools and citizens of Nebraska to observe such day as a patriotic day. Veterans Day shall be November 11, annually, unless such date falls on Saturday or Sunday, in which event the Governor may declare the preceding Friday or the following Monday as Veterans Day. No business shall be transacted on that day at any department of the State of Nebraska, except for necessary maintenance, highway construction inspection or in case of emergency. In pursuance to such proclamation, suitable exercises having reference to the wars and military campaigns of the United States, of Nebraska's role therein, and honoring the veterans of such wars and campaigns may be held in all schools of the state, both public and private.

Laws 1957, c. 392, § 1, p. 1056;

Laws 1961, c. 448, § 1, p. 1373;

Laws 1969, c. 844, § 3, p. 3181;

Laws 1973, LB 34, § 3.